Hawaii statutes.
§431:1-205 Accident and health or sickness
insurance defined. Accident and health or sickness insurance, also
referred to as disability insurance, is insurance against bodily injury,
disablement, or death by accident, or accidental means, or the expense thereof;
against disablement or expense resulting from sickness; and every insurance
appertaining thereto, including health and medical insurance. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next